Louisiana, session 2026, HB264.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:98.9 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§98.9. "Jada's Law"; sober release requirement; vehicle security following arrest
A. This Section may be cited as "Jada's Law".
B. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings
ascribed to them:
(1) "Chemical test" means a chemical test authorized by R.S. 32:661 et seq.
(2) "Legal limit" means a blood alcohol concentration of 0.08 percent for
offenses in violation of R.S. 14:98 and 0.02 percent for offenses in violation of R.S.
14:98.6.
(3) "Medically sober" means a condition in which a person is no longer
impaired to the extent that the person is a danger to himself or to others, is capable
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-807 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 264
of caring for basic needs, and does not present observable signs of intoxication or
impairment that would make release unsafe, as determined by either of the
following:
(a) A physician, registered nurse, physician assistant, paramedic, or other
licensed healthcare professional acting within the scope of practice.
(b) A correctional officer or booking supervisor trained in impairment
recognition consistent with policies adopted pursuant to Subsection H of this Section.
(4) "Operating-while-impaired offense" means a violation of R.S. 14:98 or
R.S. 14:98.6, or any substantially equivalent state law or local ordinance.
(5) "Safe-release clearance" means a written or electronic record made by
the custodial agency reflecting the determination prescribed in Subsection C of this
Section that the arrestee is eligible for release.
C.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person arrested
for an operating-while-impaired offense shall not be released from custody by bond,
personal recognizance, summons, citation, jail release, or otherwise unless the
custodial agency issues a safe-release clearance.
(2) A safe-release clearance may be issued only when the person is
medically sober and if a chemical test was administered and indicates a blood
alcohol concentration above the legal limit and the custodial agency has determined,
by a subsequent breath test or other lawful means consistent with policies adopted
pursuant to Subsection H of this Section, that the person's blood alcohol
concentration is at or below the legal limit. Nothing in this Subsection requires
repeated blood draws.
(3) If no chemical test result is available due to refusal, unavailability, or
delay outside the control of the custodial agency, a safe-release clearance may only
be issued when the person is medically sober and a minimum of eight hours has
elapsed from the time of the arrest, provided that the person may be held longer if
he is not medically sober.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-807 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 264
(4) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to deny or restrict the
entitlement of a person to bail pursuant to the Code of Criminal Procedure or limit
the authority of a court to impose additional conditions of release in accordance with
applicable law.
D.(1) Upon issuance of a safe-release clearance, the custodial agency shall
document in the booking record the planned means of transportation of the arrestee
from the facility.
(2) The custodial agency may require, as a condition of physical release from
the facility, that the person be released to a sober licensed adult, a rideshare or taxi,
public transportation, or other reasonable means that does not involve the person
operating a motor vehicle.
E.(1) When a person is arrested for an operating-while-impaired offense
arising from the operation of a motor vehicle, the arresting agency shall, as soon as
practicable, take reasonable steps to secure the motor vehicle to prevent operation
by the arrestee prior to issuance of a safe-release clearance, including at least one of
the following:
(a) Release the vehicle only to a sober, validly licensed owner or authorized
driver other than the arrestee.
(b) Cause the vehicle to be towed or stored pursuant to R.S. 32:1711 et seq.
or other applicable law or policy governing towing and storage.
(2) The arresting agency shall take custody of the ignition key or other
device necessary to operate the motor vehicle, unless the vehicle is released pursuant
to Subparagraph (1)(a) of this Subsection or is towed or stored pursuant to
Subparagraph (1)(b) of this Subsection.
F.(1) If the motor vehicle is a rental vehicle, the arresting agency shall make
reasonable efforts to notify the rental dealer, as soon as practicable, that the named
renter or driver has been arrested for an operating-while-impaired offense and shall
not be provided possession of the vehicle or key prior to a safe-release clearance.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-807 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 264
(2) The arresting agency may transmit notice electronically and may provide
the rental dealer with the name and date of birth of the arrestee, and rental agreement
number, if known, for identification purposes.
(3) The rental vehicle shall be released only to a representative of the rental
dealer or another authorized driver named in the rental agreement who is sober and
validly licensed.
G. A law enforcement agency, custodial agency, towing or storage facility
acting under direction of a public agency, and rental dealer acting in reliance on a
safe-release clearance or in good faith compliance with this Section shall not be
liable for civil damages arising solely from compliance with this Section, except for
gross negligence.
H. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, in consultation with
the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association and the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement, may adopt minimum standards, policies, and training guidance in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement this Section,
including the following:
(1) Criteria for "medically sober" determinations.
(2) Procedures for breath testing to confirm return to the legal limit when
applicable.
(3) Model safe-release clearance forms.
(4) Model rental dealer notice forms and electronic transmission methods.